Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that litter is a persistent challenge that sullies public spaces, damages natural habitats, and pollutes the environment. Improperly disposing of trash poses significant risks to public health, our environment, and the economy.The legislature also finds that single-use plastic bags are one of the most commonly found items that litter state roads, beaches, and other public spaces. Plastic bag litter is known to harm animals, particularly aquatic species, and contributes to the proliferation of microplastics, which pose significant threats to human health. Encouraging the adoption of alternatives to plastic bags, such as reusable carryout bags, reduces plastic waste. While thicker plastic bags may be more durable and reusable, initial research has demonstrated that many customers may still use them as single-use bags, and consequently, thicker plastic bags contribute to more plastic waste.The legislature also finds that when specifically tailored, penalties and fees act as effective deterrents to harmful behaviors, such as littering, and can lead to the adoption of more sustainable practices.Therefore, the legislature intends to discourage littering and the proliferation of plastic waste by enhancing penalties for littering, delaying requirements relating to increasing the thickness of reusable plastic bags, and imposing new penalties for the sale of thicker plastic bags. The legislature also intends to direct the fees collected from the new penalties to the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to address the negative impacts of litter.Sec. 2. RCW 70A.200.060 and 2024 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is a violation of this section to:(a) Abandon a junk vehicle upon any property;(b) Throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the state or upon private property in this state not owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park, beach, campground, forestland, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road, street, or alley except:(i) When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use such property for that purpose;(ii) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or public property or waters.(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, it is a class ((3))2 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than or equal to one cubic foot. This penalty is in addition to any penalty imposed for a violation of RCW 46.61.645(1).(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot but less than 10 cubic yards. A violation of this subsection may alternatively be punished with a notice of a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.(c) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter more than 10 cubic yards.(d)(i) A person found liable or guilty under this section shall, in addition to the penalties provided for misdemeanors, gross misdemeanors, or for natural resource infractions as provided in RCW 7.84.100, also pay a litter clean-up restitution payment equal to four times the actual cost of cleanup for natural resource infractions and misdemeanors and two times the actual cost of cleanup for gross misdemeanors. The court shall distribute an amount of the litter clean-up restitution payment that equals the actual cost of cleanup to the landowner where the littering incident occurred and the remainder of the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the incident.(ii) The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property.(iii) The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.(3) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of this section, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal, disposal, and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against the person who abandoned the vehicle.(4) If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any other penalties assessed, order the person to perform 24 hours of community restitution in the state park where the violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.(5) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to discard, in violation of this section, potentially dangerous litter in any amount.Sec. 3. RCW 70A.530.020 and 2021 c 65 s 78, 2021 c 65 s 77, and 2021 c 33 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning January 1, 2021, except as provided in this section and RCW 70A.530.030, a retail establishment may not provide to a customer or a person at an event:(a) A single-use plastic carryout bag;(b) A paper carryout bag that does not meet the requirements of subsection (6)(a) of this section or a reusable carryout bag made of film plastic that does not meet recycled content requirements; or(c) Beginning January 1, ((2026))2028, a reusable carryout bag made of film plastic with a thickness of less than four mils, in the event that the ((2025))2026 legislature does not amend this section to reflect the recommendations to the legislature made consistent with RCW 70A.530.060.(2)(a) A retail establishment may provide a reusable carryout bag or a compliant paper carryout bag of any size to a customer at the point of sale. A retail establishment may make reusable carryout bags available to customers through sale.(b)(i) Until December 31, 2025, a retail establishment must collect a pass-through charge of eight cents for every compliant paper carryout bag with a manufacturer's stated capacity of one-eighth barrel (eight hundred eighty-two cubic inches) or greater or reusable carryout bag made of film plastic it provides, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and RCW 70A.530.030.(ii) Beginning January 1, 2026, a retail establishment must collect a pass-through charge of twelve cents for reusable carryout bags made of film plastic and eight cents for compliant paper carryout bags((, in the event that the 2025 legislature does not amend this section to reflect the recommendations to the legislature made consistent with RCW 70A.530.060. It is the intent of the legislature for the 2025 legislature to reassess the amount of the pass-through charge authorized under this subsection (2)(b), taking into consideration the content of the report to the legislature under RCW 70A.530.060)).(iii) Until December 31, 2027, a retail establishment that offers for sale a reusable carryout bag made of film plastic with a thickness equal to or greater than four mils shall collect, in addition to the 12 cent pass-through charge, a four cent penalty. The penalty shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account under RCW 70A.200.140.(c) A retail establishment must keep all revenue from pass-through charges, not including the penalty provided under (b)(iii) of this subsection. The pass-through charge is a taxable retail sale. A retail establishment must show all pass-through charges and penalties on a receipt provided to the customer.(3) Carryout bags provided by a retail establishment do not include:(a) Bags used by consumers inside stores to:(i) Package bulk items, such as fruit, vegetables, nuts, grains, candy, greeting cards, or small hardware items such as nails, bolts, or screws;(ii) Contain or wrap items where dampness or sanitation might be a problem including, but not limited to:(A) Frozen foods;(B) Meat;(C) Fish;(D) Flowers; and(E) Potted plants;(iii) Contain unwrapped prepared foods or bakery goods;(iv) Contain prescription drugs; or(v) Protect a purchased item from damaging or contaminating other purchased items when placed in a compliant paper carryout bag or reusable carryout bag; or(b) Newspaper bags, mailing pouches, sealed envelopes, door hanger bags, laundry/dry cleaning bags, or bags sold in packages containing multiple bags for uses such as food storage, garbage, or pet waste.(4)(a) Any compostable film bag that a retail establishment provides to customers for products, including for products bagged in stores prior to checkout, must meet the requirements for compostable products and film bags in chapter 70A.455 RCW.(b) A retail establishment may not use or provide polyethylene or other noncompostable plastic bags for bagging of customer products in stores, as carryout bags, or for home delivery that do not meet the requirements for noncompostable products and film bags in chapter 70A.455 RCW.(5) Except as provided by local regulations enacted as of April 1, 2020, a retail establishment may provide a bag restricted under subsection (1) of this section from existing inventory until one year after June 11, 2020. The retail establishment, upon request by the department, must provide purchase invoices, distribution receipts, or other information documenting that the bag was acquired prior to June 11, 2020.(6) For the purposes of this section:(a) A compliant paper carryout bag must:(i) Contain a minimum of forty percent postconsumer recycled materials, a minimum of 40 percent nonwood renewable fiber, or a combination of postconsumer recycled materials and nonwood renewable fiber that totals at least 40 percent;(ii) Be capable of composting, consistent with the timeline and specifications of the entire American society of testing materials D6868 and associated test methods that must be met, as it existed as of January 1, 2020; and(iii) Display in print on the exterior of the paper bag the minimum percentage of postconsumer content, wheat straw fiber content, or both.(b) A reusable carryout bag must:(i) Have a minimum lifetime of one hundred twenty-five uses, which for purposes of this subsection means the capacity to carry a minimum of twenty-two pounds one hundred twenty-five times over a distance of at least one hundred seventy-five feet;(ii) Be machine washable or made from a durable material that may be cleaned or disinfected; and(iii) If made of film plastic:(A) Be made from a minimum of twenty percent postconsumer recycled content until July 1, 2022, and thereafter must be made from a minimum of forty percent postconsumer recycled content;(B) Display in print on the exterior of the plastic bag the minimum percentage of postconsumer recycled content, the mil thickness, and that the bag is reusable; and(C) Have a minimum thickness of no less than 2.25 mils until December 31, ((2025))2027, and beginning January 1, ((2026))2028, must have a minimum thickness of four mils.(c) Except for the purposes of subsection (4) of this section, food banks and other food assistance programs are not retail establishments, but are encouraged to take actions to reduce the use of single-use plastic carryout bags.--- END ---